Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-125
Nebraska State Historical Society; property known as Neligh Mills; acquire title; cost; limitation; maintenance.

The Nebraska State Historical Society is hereby authorized to acquire clear title in the name of the State of Nebraska, at a cost not to exceed five thousand dollars, of property known as the Neligh Mills and located in Antelope County. If the society is unable to acquire title to such property within one year after June 27, 1969, any money appropriated for such purpose shall revert to the General Fund, and any portion of such appropriation not required for the acquisition of such property shall revert to the General Fund. The society shall be responsible for the administration and continued maintenance of such property, if acquired, and may accept gifts, grants, and bequests for such purposes.

Laws 1969, c. 809, § 1, p. 3046.